Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Chapter 10 Collective Bargaining for Fire Fighters

Cross references. —

For constitutional provision requiring legislature to provide for voluntary submission of differences to arbitrators, see art. 19, § 8, Wyo. Const.

As to civil service for fire and police departments in cities and towns, see §§

15-5-101

through

15-5-122

.

§ 27-10-101.
Definitions.

As used in this act [§§

27-10-101

through

27-10-109

] the following terms shall, unless the context requires a different interpretation, have the following meanings:

The term “fire fighters” shall mean the paid members of any regularly constituted fire department in any city, town or county within the state;

The term “corporate authorities” shall mean the council, commission or other proper officials of any city, town or county, whose duty or duties it is to establish wages, salaries, rates of pay, working conditions, and other conditions of employment of fire fighters.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 197, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 27-265.

Cross references. —

As to cities and towns generally, see title 15.

As to counties generally, see title 18.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Provisions are constitutional.

State ex rel. Fire Fighters Local 946 v. Laramie, 437 P.2d 295,

1968 Wyo. LEXIS 157

(Wyo. 1968).

Term “corporate authorities,”

as used in this chapter, means those municipal officers who are either directly elected by the inhabitants of the municipality or are appointed in some mode to which they (the inhabitants) have given their consent. Nation v. State, 518 P.2d 931,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. 1974).

The term “corporate authorities,” as used in this section and §

27-10-104

, does not include persons appointed by the mayor, when such persons have not been elected and have not been appointed pursuant to a statute authorizing the appointment. Nation v. State, 518 P.2d 931,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. 1974).

“Fire fighters.”—

Unions were not properly constituted bargaining units under the Wyoming Collective Bargaining for Fire Fighters Act because (1) volunteer and pool firefighters did not participate in choosing the unions, (2) volunteer and pool firefighters were paid members of their respective departments statutorily entitled to collectively bargain, (3) statutory “context” language in the definition of fire fighters was construed narrowly and not as an improper invitation for courts to define who may unionize, and (4) the legislature intended a collective bargaining agent to represent all department members, including volunteer and pool fire fighters. Int'l Ass'n of Fire Fighters Local Union No. 5058 v. Gillette/Wright/Campbell Cty. Fire Prot. Joint Powers Bd., 2018 WY 75, 421 P.3d 1059,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 2018).

Term “corporate authorities.” —

City's mayor and/or single council member could not negotiate with a firefighters' union because the mayor and/or single council member were not “corporate authorities,” with wage setting authority, so city council was required to negotiate with the union. Int'l Ass'n of Firefighters Local Union No. 279 v. City of Cheyenne, 2013 WY 157, 316 P.3d 1162,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 2013).

City cannot challenge legality of provisions. —

A city, as a creature of the legislature, may question the interpretation of this chapter, but it cannot challenge its legality. The appropriate remedy is the presentation of its grievance to the forum that is responsible for it. If the policy is wrong, the legislature will no doubt correct it. State ex rel. Fire Fighters Local v. Kingham, 420 P.2d 254,

1966 Wyo. LEXIS 179

(Wyo. 1966).

Cited

in

Retail Clerks Local 187 v. University of Wyo., 531 P.2d 884,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 129

(Wyo. 1975); Casper v. International Ass'n of Firefighters, Local 904, 713 P.2d 1187,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 474

(Wyo. 1986).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Right of Wyoming State and Municipal Employees to Organize, Receive Exclusive Recognition, and Bargain Collectively,” see V Land & Water L. Rev. 605 (1970).

§ 27-10-102.
Right to collective bargaining and representation by bargaining agent.

The fire fighters in any city, town or county shall have the right to bargain collectively with their respective cities, towns or counties and to be represented by a bargaining agent in such collective bargaining as to wages, rates of pay, working conditions and all other terms and conditions of employment.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 197, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 27-266.

“Fire fighters.”—

Unions were not properly constituted bargaining units under the Wyoming Collective Bargaining for Fire Fighters Act because (1) volunteer and pool firefighters did not participate in choosing the unions, (2) volunteer and pool firefighters were paid members of their respective departments statutorily entitled to collectively bargain, (3) statutory “context” language in the definition of fire fighters was construed narrowly and not as an improper invitation for courts to define who may unionize, and (4) the legislature intended a collective bargaining agent to represent all department members, including volunteer and pool fire fighters. Int'l Ass'n of Fire Fighters Local Union No. 5058 v. Gillette/Wright/Campbell Cty. Fire Prot. Joint Powers Bd., 2018 WY 75, 421 P.3d 1059,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 2018).

Quoted

in

Casper v. International Ass'n of Firefighters, Local 904, 713 P.2d 1187,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 474

(Wyo. 1986).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Who are employees forbidden to strike under state enactments or state common-law rules prohibiting strikes by public employees or stated classes of public employees, 22 ALR4th 1103.

First amendment protection for publicly employed firefighters subjected to discharge, transfer or discipline because of speech, 106 ALR Fed 396.

§ 27-10-103.
Selection of exclusive bargaining agent by majority; withdrawal of agent by majority.

The organization selected by the majority of the fire fighters in any city, town or county shall be recognized as the sole and exclusive bargaining agent for all of the members of the department, unless and until recognition of such bargaining agent is withdrawn by vote of a majority of the fire fighters.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 197, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 27-267.

Quoted

in

Casper v. International Ass'n of Firefighters, Local 904, 713 P.2d 1187,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 474

(Wyo. 1986).

"Fire fighters."

Unions were not properly constituted bargaining units under the Wyoming Collective Bargaining for Fire Fighters Act because (1) volunteer and pool firefighters did not participate in choosing the unions, (2) volunteer and pool firefighters were paid members of their respective departments statutorily entitled to collectively bargain, (3) statutory “context” language in the definition of fire fighters was construed narrowly and not as an improper invitation for courts to define who may unionize, and (4) the legislature intended a collective bargaining agent to represent all department members, including volunteer and pool fire fighters. Int'l Ass'n of Fire Fighters Local Union No. 5058 v. Gillette/Wright/Campbell Cty. Fire Prot. Joint Powers Bd., 2018 WY 75, 421 P.3d 1059,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 79

(Wyo. 2018).

§ 27-10-104.
Obligation of city, town or county to meet with agent after written notice; written contract of agreement.

It shall be the obligation of the city, town or county, through its corporate authorities, to meet and confer in good faith with the representative or representatives of the bargaining agent within ten (10) days after receipt of written notice from said bargaining agent of the request for a meeting for collective bargaining purposes. This obligation shall include the duty to cause any agreement resulting from negotiations to be reduced to a written contract, provided that no such contract shall exceed the term of two (2) years.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 197, § 4; W.S. 1957, § 27-268; Laws 2001, ch. 120, § 1.

Term “corporate authorities.” —

City's mayor and/or single council member could not negotiate with a firefighters' union because the mayor and/or single council member were not “corporate authorities,” with wage setting authority, so city council was required to negotiate with the union. Int'l Ass'n of Firefighters Local Union No. 279 v. City of Cheyenne, 2013 WY 157, 316 P.3d 1162,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 163

(Wyo. 2013).

No party can enforce agreement where negotiations were not conducted by “corporate authorities.”

The legislature has mandated that negotiations with representatives of the bargaining agent of the city's fire fighters be by the “corporate authorities” of the city, town or county; i.e., by the mayor, city manager, or members of the council of a city or town, and by the county commissioners of a county. Casper v. International Ass'n of Firefighters, Local 904, 713 P.2d 1187,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 474

(Wyo. 1986).

Term “corporate authorities,”

as used in this chapter, means those municipal officers who are either directly elected by the inhabitants of the municipality or are appointed in some mode to which they (the inhabitants) have given their consent. Nation v. State, 518 P.2d 931,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. 1974).

The term “corporate authorities,” as used in §

27-10-101

and this section, does not include persons appointed by the mayor, when such persons have not been elected and have not been appointed pursuant to a statute authorizing the appointment. Nation v. State, 518 P.2d 931,

1974 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. 1974).

§ 27-10-105.
When issues to be submitted to arbitration.

In the event that the bargaining agent and the corporate authorities are unable, within thirty (30) days from and including the date of their first meeting, to reach an agreement on a contract, any and all unresolved issues shall be submitted to arbitration.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 197, § 5; W.S. 1957, § 27-269.

Quoted

in

Casper v. International Ass'n of Firefighters, Local 904, 713 P.2d 1187,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 474

(Wyo. 1986).

§ 27-10-106.
Selection of arbitrators.

Within five (5) days from the expiration of the thirty (30) day period referred to in W.S.

27-10-105

, the bargaining agent and the corporate authorities shall each select and name one (1) arbitrator and shall immediately thereafter notify each other in writing of the name and address of the person so selected. The two (2) arbitrators so selected and named shall, within ten (10) days from and after the expiration of the five (5) day period hereinbefore mentioned, agree upon and select and name a third arbitrator. If on the expiration of the period allowed therefor the arbitrators are unable to agree upon the selection of a third arbitrator, a district judge of the judicial district within which the city is located, shall select him upon request in writing from either the bargaining agent or the corporate authorities. The third arbitrator, whether selected as a result of agreement between the two (2) arbitrators previously selected, or selected by a district judge, shall act as chairman of the arbitration board.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 197, § 6; W.S. 1957, § 27-270.

Quoted

in

Casper v. International Ass'n of Firefighters, Local 904, 713 P.2d 1187,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 474

(Wyo. 1986).

§ 27-10-107.
Arbitration procedure.

Arbitration shall proceed pursuant to the provisions of the Uniform Arbitration Act [§§

1-36-101

through

1-36-119

].

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 197, § 7; W.S. 1957, § 27-271.

Quoted

in

Casper v. International Ass'n of Firefighters, Local 904, 713 P.2d 1187,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 474

(Wyo. 1986).

§ 27-10-108.
Collective bargaining contract; duration of contract.

Any agreements actually negotiated between the bargaining agent and the corporate authorities either before, or within thirty (30) days after arbitration, shall constitute the collective bargaining contract governing fire fighters and said city, town or county for the period stated therein provided that term of such contract shall not exceed two (2) years.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 197, § 8; W.S. 1957, § 27-272; Laws 2001, ch. 120, § 1.

Quoted

in

Casper v. International Ass'n of Firefighters, Local 904, 713 P.2d 1187,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 474

(Wyo. 1986).

§ 27-10-109.
Notice of request for bargaining prior to day on which money can be appropriated.

Whenever wages, rates of pay, or any other matter requiring appropriation of money by any city, town or county are included as matter of collective bargaining conducted under the provisions of this act [§§

27-10-101

through

27-10-109

], it is the obligation of the bargaining agent to serve written notice of request for collective bargaining on the corporate authorities at least one hundred twenty (120) days before the last day on which money can be appropriated by the city, town or county to cover the contract period which is the subject of the collective bargaining procedure.

History.

Laws 1965, ch. 197, § 9; W.S. 1957, § 27-273.

Quoted

in

Casper v. International Ass'n of Firefighters, Local 904, 713 P.2d 1187,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 474

(Wyo. 1986).

Law reviews. —

For comment, “The Right of Wyoming State and Municipal Employees to Organize, Receive Exclusive Recognition, and Bargain Collectively,” see V Land & Water L. Rev. 605 (1970).